Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 12 Evidence and Witnesses

Cross references. —

As to granting of continuances because of the absence of evidence, see §

1-9-101

.

As to testimony and witnesses in criminal cases, see §

7-11-401

et seq.

For provision that evidence of conviction for violation of Uniform Act Regulating Traffic on Highways shall not be admissible in civil actions, see §

31-5-1208

.

As to evidence generally, see Rule 43, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

1-12-101

,

1-12-106

,

1-12-201

to 1-12-203,

1-12-301

to

1-12-303

,

1-12-401

to

1-12-402

and

1-12-501

to

1-12-502

, which formerly appeared, respectively, as §§ 1-138, 1-143, 1-160 to 1-162, 1-165 to 1-169, 1-170 to 1-173 and 1-174 to 1-177, W.S. 1957, and which were recodified by ch. 188, Laws 1977, as part of chapter 12 in revised title 1, effective January 1, 1978, were superseded by the Wyoming Rules of Evidence. See Rule 1102, W.R.E. Accordingly, the provisions enumerated have been deleted, the remaining sections in chapter 12 have been redesignated in order to maintain proper numerical sequence and internal references in the statutes have been changed to the corrected numbers.